Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Museum Inventory Act

4-12-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Museum Inventory Act.”

Acts 1983, ch. 214, § 1.

Cross-References. Abandoned cultural property, title 66, ch. 29, part 2.

4-12-202. Exemption from inventory procedures.

It is the intention and purpose of the general assembly that the Tennessee state museum shall be exempted from inventorying its various collections under the rules established by the department of general services.

Acts 1983, ch. 214, § 2.

4-12-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Tennessee state museum” means the facility operated as the military branch of the Tennessee state museum in the War Memorial Building, the facility in the James K. Polk Building, and the Bill Haslam Center located at 1000 Rosa L. Parks Boulevard; and

“The various collections of articles, specimens and relics placed under the charge of the state museum executive director” means those collections owned and acquired by the state, the Tennessee Historical Society, Inc., or other entities.

Acts 1983, ch. 214, § 3; 2018, ch. 821, § 13; 2020, ch. 800, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning Governor Haslam, see Acts 2020, ch. 800.